Utah statutes.
15-6-2.   Time for payment by state agencies.

(1) An agency of the state of Utah which acquires property or services pursuant to a contract with a business shall pay for each complete delivered item of property or service on the date required by contract between such business and agency or, if no date for payment is specified by contract, within 60 days after receipt of the invoice covering the delivered items or services.

(2)  The acquisition of property includes the rental of real or personal property.



Enacted by Chapter 300, 1983 General Session

